Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-734
Employer's receipt of income withholding order of another state.

An income withholding order issued in another state may be sent by or on behalf of the obligee or by the support enforcement agency to the person defined as the obligor's employer under the Income Withholding for Child Support Act or sections 42-347 to 42-381 without first filing a petition or comparable pleading or registering the order with a tribunal of this state.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 34;

Laws 1997, LB 727, § 10;

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 71.

Income Withholding for Child Support Act, see section 43-1701.

This section allowed the plaintiff to send a Wisconsin child support order to the defendant's Nebraska employer without first filing a petition or registering the order with a tribunal of Nebraska, and the employer was required to provide the defendant with a copy of the order and to distribute funds as directed by the Wisconsin order. Harvey v. Harvey, 6 Neb. App. 524, 575 N.W.2d 167 (1998).